Utah statutes.
32B-5-403.   Alcohol training and education -- Revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal of retail license.

(1)  The commission may suspend, revoke, or not renew a license of a retail licensee if any of the following individuals, as defined in Section 62A-15-401, fail to complete an alcohol training and education seminar:

(a)  an individual who manages operations at the licensed premises for consumption on the licensed premises;

(b)  an individual who supervises the furnishing of an alcoholic product to a patron for consumption on the licensed premises; or

(c)  an individual who serves an alcoholic product to a patron for consumption on the licensed premises.

(2)  A city, town, or county in which a retail licensee conducts its business may suspend, revoke, or not renew the business license of the retail licensee if an individual described in Subsection (1) fails to complete an alcohol training and education seminar.

(3)  A local authority that issues an off-premise beer retailer license to a business that is engaged in the retail sale of beer for consumption off the beer retailer's premises may immediately suspend the off-premise beer retailer license if any of the following individuals fails to complete an alcohol training and education seminar, an individual who:

(a)  directly supervises the sale of beer to a patron for consumption off the premises of the off-premise beer retailer; or

(b)  sells beer to a patron for consumption off the premises of the off-premise beer retailer.

